lib/dict/cs_CZ.aff
SFX A   ít          ily        [^èø]ít
SFX A   ít          eme        ¾ít
SFX A   ít          ete        ¾ít
SFX A   ít          u          øít
SFX A   ít          e¹         øít
SFX A   ít          e          øít
SFX A   ít          eme        øít
SFX A   ít          ete        øít
SFX A   ít          ou         øít
SFX A   ít          i          øít
SFX A   ít          el         øít
SFX A   ít          ela        øít
SFX A   ít          elo        øít
SFX A   ít          eli        øít
SFX A   ít          ely        øít
SFX A   ít          nu         èít
SFX A   ít          ne¹        èít
SFX A   ít          ne         èít
SFX A   ít          neme       èít
SFX A   ít          nete       èít
SFX A   ít          nou        èít
SFX A   ít          ni         èít
SFX A   ít          nìme       èít
SFX A   ít          nìte       èít
SFX A   ít          al         èít
SFX A   ít          ala        èít
SFX A   ít          alo        èít
SFX A   ít          ali        èít
SFX A   ít          aly        èít
SFX A   ìt          ím         [^d]ìt
SFX A   ìt          í¹         [^d]ìt
SFX A   ìt          í          [^d]ìt
SFX A   ìt          íme        [^d]ìt
SFX A   ìt          íte        [^d]ìt
SFX A   t           j          [^dnt]ìt
SFX A   t           jme        [^dnt]ìt
SFX A   t           jte        [^dnt]ìt
SFX A   ìdìt        ím         ìdìt
SFX A   ìdìt        í¹         ìdìt
SFX A   ìdìt        í          ìdìt
SFX A   ìdìt        íme        ìdìt
SFX A   ìdìt        íte        ìdìt
SFX A   ìt          í          ìdìt
SFX A   dìt         z          ìdìt
SFX A   dìt         zme        ìdìt
SFX A   dìt         zte        ìdìt
SFX A   t           j          ádìt
SFX A   t           jme        ádìt
SFX A   t           jte        ádìt
SFX A   ìt          ím         [^ì]dìt
SFX A   ìt          í¹         [^ì]dìt
SFX A   ìt          í          [^ì]dìt
SFX A   ìt          íme        [^ì]dìt
SFX A   ìt          íte        [^ì]dìt
SFX A   dìt         ï          [^áì]dìt
SFX A   dìt         ïte        [^áì]dìt
SFX A   dìt         ïme        [^áì]dìt
SFX A   tìt         »          tìt
SFX A   tìt         »me        tìt
SFX A   tìt         »te        tìt
SFX A   ìt          i          [aeiouyáéíóúýùì][lr]nìt
SFX A   ìt          ìme        [aeiouyáéíóúýùì][lr]nìt
SFX A   ìt          ìte        [aeiouyáéíóúýùì][lr]nìt
SFX A   nìt         ò          [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì][lr]nìt
SFX A   nìt         òme        [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì][lr]nìt
SFX A   nìt         òte        [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì][lr]nìt
SFX A   ìt          i          [^aeiouyáéíóúýùìlr]nìt
SFX A   ìt          ìme        [^aeiouyáéíóúýùìlr]nìt
SFX A   ìt          ìte        [^aeiouyáéíóúýùìlr]nìt
SFX A   nìt         ò          [aeiouyáéíóúýùì]nìt
SFX A   nìt         òme        [aeiouyáéíóúýùì]nìt
SFX A   nìt         òte        [aeiouyáéíóúýùì]nìt
SFX A   et          ím         et
SFX A   et          í¹         et
SFX A   et          í          et
SFX A   et          íme        et
SFX A   et          íte        et
SFX A   t           0          et
SFX A   et          íc         et
SFX A   et          íce        et
SFX A   et          i          [^aeiouyáéíóúýùìrl][^aeiouyáéíóúýùì]et
SFX A   t           me         [^aeiouyáéíóúýùìrl][^aeiouyáéíóúýùì]et
SFX A   0           e          [^aeiouyáéíóúýùìrl][^aeiouyáéíóúýùì]et
SFX A   t           j          [áéíóúýù][^aeiouyáéíóúýùì]et
SFX A   t           jme        [áéíóúýù][^aeiouyáéíóúýùì]et
SFX A   t           jte        [áéíóúýù][^aeiouyáéíóúýùì]et
SFX A   et          0          [aeiouyìrl][^aeiouyáéíóúýùì]et
SFX A   et          me         [aeiouyìrl][^aeiouyáéíóúýùì]et
SFX A   et          te         [aeiouyìrl][^aeiouyáéíóúýùì]et
SFX A   t           0          ìt
SFX A   ìt          íc         ìt
SFX A   ìt          íce        ìt
SFX A   out         u          nout
SFX A   out         e¹         nout
SFX A   out         e          nout
SFX A   out         eme        nout
SFX A   out         ete        nout
SFX A   t           0          nout
SFX A   out         a          nout
SFX A   t           c          nout
SFX A   t           ce         nout
SFX A   nout        ò          [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì][rl]nout
SFX A   nout        òme        [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì][rl]nout
SFX A   nout        òte        [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì][rl]nout
SFX A   out         i          [aeiouyáéíóúýùì][rl]nout
SFX A   out         ìme        [aeiouyáéíóúýùì][rl]nout
SFX A   out         ìte        [aeiouyáéíóúýùì][rl]nout
SFX A   nout        ò          [aeiouyáéíóúýùì]nout
SFX A   nout        òme        [aeiouyáéíóúýùì]nout
SFX A   nout        òte        [aeiouyáéíóúýùì]nout
SFX A   out         i          [^aeiouyáéíóúýùìrl]nout
SFX A   out         ìme        [^aeiouyáéíóúýùìrl]nout
SFX A   out         ìte        [^aeiouyáéíóúýùìrl]nout
SFX A   out         ul         [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì][rl]nout
SFX A   out         ula        [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì][rl]nout
SFX A   out         ulo        [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì][rl]nout
SFX A   out         uli        [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì][rl]nout
SFX A   out         uly        [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì][rl]nout
SFX A   nout        l          [aeiouyáéíóúýùì]rnout
SFX A   nout        la         [aeiouyáéíóúýùì]rnout
SFX A   nout        lo         [aeiouyáéíóúýùì]rnout
SFX A   nout        li         [aeiouyáéíóúýùì]rnout
SFX A   nout        ly         [aeiouyáéíóúýùì]rnout
SFX A   nout        l          [aeiouyáéíóúýùìr][^aeiouyáéíóúýùìrl]nout
SFX A   out         ul         [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì]l[^aeiouyáéíóúýùìrl]nout
SFX A   nout        l          l[^aeiouyáéíóúýùìrl]nout
SFX A   nout        la         [^aeiouyáéíóúýùìrl]nout
SFX A   nout        lo         [^aeiouyáéíóúýùìrl]nout
SFX A   nout        li         [^aeiouyáéíóúýùìrl]nout
SFX A   nout        ly         [^aeiouyáéíóúýùìrl]nout
SFX A   out         ul         [aeiouyáéíóúýùìl]nout
SFX A   out         ula        [aeiouyáéíóúýùìl]nout
SFX A   out         ulo        [aeiouyáéíóúýùìl]nout
SFX A   out         uli        [aeiouyáéíóúýùìl]nout
SFX A   out         uly        [aeiouyáéíóúýùìl]nout
SFX A   0           a          n
SFX A   0           o          n
SFX A   0           i          n
SFX A   0           y          n
SFX A   0           a          yt
SFX A   0           o          yt
SFX A   0           i          yt
SFX A   0           y          yt
SFX A   0           a          [^o]ut
SFX A   0           o          [^o]ut
SFX A   0           i          [^o]ut
SFX A   0           y          [^o]ut
SFX A   0           i          [^coy]t
SFX A   t           i          ct
