lib/dict/cs_CZ.dic
adsorbovat/ATN
alarmovat/ATN
anektovat/ATN
argumentovat/ATN
auditovat/ATN
balovat/ATN
bednit/ATN
bláznit/ATN
bobovat/AN
brakovat/ATN
bronzovat/ATN
bydlit/AN
cepovat/ATN
cizoloľit/AN
cvočkovat/ATN
černit/ATN
čmajznout/ATN
dealokovat/ATN
degustovat/ATN
dekorovat/ATN
demontovat/ATN
derivovat/ATN
devitalizovat/ATN
disgustovat/ATN
divergovat/ATN
dobalit/ATN
dobojovat/ATN
docenit/ATN
dočepýřit/ATN
dodolovat/ATN
dodusit/ACN
doglosovat/ATN
dohodit/ACN
dohryzat/AJTN
dochřoupat/AJTN
dokázat/ATN
dokmitnout/AN
dokopnout/ATN
dokreslovat/ATN
dokulmovat/ATN
dolaąkovat/ATN
dolíznout/ATN
domáknout/AN
domířit/ATN
domyslet/AN
doopravit/ATN
doparketovat/ATN
doplátkovat/ATN
doportovat/ATN
doprosit/ATN
doradovat/AN
dorodit/AN
dořičet/AN
dosídlit/ATN
doslovovat/ATN
dosoupeřit/ATN
dostřečkovat/AN
dosvětit/ACN
doąkatulkovat/ATN
doąpendlit/ATN
dotapetovat/ATN
dotknout/ACTN
dotrylkovat/ATN
dovalit/ATN
dovézt/ATN
dovrtět/ATN
dozáplatovat/ATN
dozvučovat/ATN
drátkovat/ATN
drsnět/AJN
dupnout/ATN
eliminovat/ATN
evakuovat/ATN
expurgovat/ATN
fasetovat/ATN
fingovat/ATN
formátovat/ATN
fučet/AN
glajchąaltovat/ATN
hačnout/AN
harmonisovat/ATN
hierarchizovat/ATN
hmoľdit/AN
honosit/AN
hovět/AJN
hryzat/AJTN
humanizovat/ATN
hýřit/ATN
chodit/AN
chřadnout/AN
ignorovat/ATN
indexovat/ATN
inkrementovat/ATN
interferovat/AN
ionizovat/ATN
jehlovat/ATN
kadeřit/ATN
kanetovat/ATN
klapat/AJTN
klučit/ATN
kombinovat/ATN
konsekrovat/ATN
korigovat/ATN
krakovat/ATN
křehnout/AN
kupit/ATN
láhvovat/ATN
letovat/ATN
lokalizovat/ATN
mámit/ATN
memorovat/ATN
mnoľit/ATN
mrznout/ATN
naběhnout/AN
načichnout/AN
nadlétnout/ATN
nafackovat/ATN
nahromadit/ATN
naklást/ATN
nakreslit/ATN
nalamentovat/AN
namalovat/ATN
naohýbat/AJTN
naplazit/AN
napřáhnout/ACN
nařvat/AN
nasnít/ATN
nasunout/ATN
naąroubovat/ATN
natupírovat/ATN
navonět/ATN
neologizovat/ATN
obarvit/ATN
obhryzat/AJTN
oblehnout/ACN
obořovat/AN
obstřikovat/ATN
ocínovat/ATN
odblanit/ATN
oddálit/ATN
odformalizovat/ATN
odhryzat/AJTN
odklonit/ATN
odkupovat/ATN
odloudit/ATN
odmlľovat/ATN
odpečetit/ATN
odpočnout/ATN
odrecitovat/ATN
odsířit/ATN
odstřelit/ATN
odątípat/AJTN
odtučnit/ATN
odvládnout/ATN
odľenątit/ATN
ohroľovat/ATN
oklepat/AJTN
okukovat/AN
omezovat/ATN
opatřovat/ATN
opodstatňovat/ATN
optovat/ATN
osifikovat/ATN
osprchovat/ATN
oąlapat/AJTN
otřít/ATN
ozdravit/ATN
pádit/AN
parkovat/ATN
pěnit/ATN
plakat/AN
poanglič»ovat/ATN
podávit/ATN
podílet/AJN
podnítit/ACN
podskakovat/ATN
podvrtnout/ATN
pohrabat/ATN
pojit/ATN
pokrčovat/ATN
poleľet/AN
pomlčet/AN
poohlídnout/AN
popotahovat/ATN
poručníkovat/AN
posolit/ATN
posunkovat/AN
potencovat/ATN
povařit/ATN
povzdychnout/ATN
poľidovątit/ATN
probarvovat/ATN
pročistit/ACN
profouknout/ATN
prohýřit/ATN
prokonsultovat/ATN
prolamovat/ATN
proměąovat/ATN
propisovat/ATN
prořídnout/AN
prosrat/ATN
proąkrábnout/ATN
protočit/ATN
provlhčovat/ATN
přebarvovat/ATN
přečlenit/ATN
předkompilovat/ATN
předplíľit/AN
předtáhnout/ACN
přefotografovat/ATN
přehustit/ACN
překolkovat/ATN
překříľit/ATN
přelidnit/ATN
přemontovat/ATN
přepísknout/ATN
přerazítkovat/ATN
přesklít/ATN
přestylizovat/ATN
přetahovat/ATN
přetvářet/AJTN
převrhnout/ACN
přibouchnout/ATN
přihlédnout/AN
přikořenit/ATN
přilepąovat/ATN
přinoľovat/ATN
připodobnit/ATN
přischnout/AN
přistupovat/AN
přitěľovat/ATN
přivěąovat/ATN
pudrovat/ATN
rámovat/ATN
registrovat/ATN
rendrovat/ATN
revitalizovat/ATN
rozbahnit/ATN
rozčeřovat/ATN
rozebrat/ATXN
rozhazovat/ATN
rozjasňovat/ATN
rozkreslit/ATN
rozlítostnit/ATN
rozmluvit/ATN
rozpařit/ATN
rozpráąit/ATN
rozřeąit/ATN
roząifrovat/ATN
rozteskňovat/ATN
rozvařit/ATN
rozvrhovat/ATN
rýpat/AJTN
sáknout/AN
sdruľit/ATN
seřadit/ACTN
sestřelit/ATN
seą»ouchnout/ATN
shořet/ATN
simulovat/ATN
skličovat/ATN
skřípět/AN
slisovat/ATN
směsovat/ATN
sníľit/ATN
spárovat/ATN
spojovat/ATN
spoluvlastnit/ATN
srąet/AN
stihnout/ACN
strhnout/ACN
subskribovat/ATN
svěřit/ATN
sympatizovat/ATN
ąevelit/AN
ąlechtit/ATN
ąrafovat/ATN
tabuizovat/ATN
tesařit/AN
tmelit/ATN
trefovat/AN
tříbit/ATN
ubezpečovat/ATN
učíst/ATN
uhníst/AN
ujezdit/ATN
ukoulet/AJTN
ulizovat/ATN
umoľnit/ATN
upíchnout/ATN
uproąovat/ATN
uřvat/AN
usmrcovat/ATN
ustrojit/ATN
uątípnout/ATN
útorovat/ATN
uváľit/ATN
uzemnit/ATN
vařit/ATN
vepisovat/ATN
vhrabat/ATN
vkročit/ATN
vměąovat/ATN
vpichovat/ATN
vřazovat/ATN
vtahovat/ATN
vyběhnout/ATN
vybudovat/ATN
vyčiňovat/ATN
vydrancovat/ATN
vyfotit/ACN
vyholit/ATN
vyhvízdnout/ATN
vykázat/ATN
vykopírovat/ATN
vykřičet/ATN
vyletovat/ATN
vyluxovat/ATN
vymodelovat/ATN
vyobrazovat/ATN
vyplakátovat/AN
vypomoci/AN
vyprąet/ATN
vyrýpnout/ATN
vyskakovat/AN
vysoutěľit/ATN
vystrojovat/ATN
vyąachovat/ATN
vyąroubovat/ATN
vytíľit/ATN
vytuąovat/ATN
vyvěsit/ACN
vyzbrojit/ATN
vyľrat/ATN
vzorovat/ATN
zabarvit/ATN
zabořovat/ATN
zacílit/ATN
zadekretovat/ATN
zafučet/AN
zahlubovat/ATN
zahubit/ATN
zainteresovat/ATN
zaklepat/AJTN
zakotvit/ATN
zakřiknout/ATN
zalergizovat/ATN
zamáčknout/ATN
zamordovat/ATN
zaobroubit/ATN
zapilovat/ATN
zapouzdřit/ATN
zarachotit/AN
zařezat/AJTN
zaslepovat/ATN
zastínit/ATN
zaąantročit/ATN
zaąramotit/AN
zateplovat/ATN
zatuchnout/ATN
zavelet/ATN
závorovat/ATN
zazmatkařit/AN
zbohatnout/AN
zcivilizovat/ATN
zdestruovat/ATN
zdrľet/ATN
zeskelnatět/AJTN
zevlovat/ATN
zhlédnout/ATXN
zhudebňovat/ATN
zintensivnit/ATN
zkalkulovat/ATN
zkoncentrovat/ATN
zkracovat/ATN
zkultivovat/ATN
zlikvidovat/ATN
změkčit/ATN
zmonitorovat/ATN
znázornit/ATN
zneprůhlednit/ATN
znevěrohodnit/ATN
zobat/AJTN
zoąklivit/ATN
zploą»ovat/ATN
zpozornět/AJN
zprůtočnit/ATN
zranit/ATN
zrezavět/AJTN
ztechnizovat/ATN
ztrpčovat/ATN
zuąlechtit/ATN
zvětřit/ATN
zvulkanizovat/ATN
ľmolkovatět/ATN
